New York, session 2025-2026, A10453.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Savanna's Law". 3 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-aa to 4 read as follows: 5 § 837-aa. Persistent domestic violence offender registry. 1. As used 6 in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 7 (a) "Convicted" and "conviction" mean a verdict of guilty by a judge 8 or jury or a plea of guilty and include a plea of nolo contendere and a 9 best interest plea accepted by the court. 10 (b) "Victim of domestic violence" has the same meaning as defined in 11 section four hundred fifty-nine-a of the social services law. 12 (c) "Persistent domestic violence offender" means a person who: 13 (i) has been convicted in this state of a domestic violence offense; 14 and 15 (ii) has at least one prior conviction for a domestic violence 16 offense. 17 (d) "Domestic violence" means an act which would constitute a 18 violation of the penal law, including, but not limited to acts consti- 19 tuting disorderly conduct, harassment, aggravated harassment, sexual 20 misconduct, forcible touching, sexual abuse, stalking, criminal 21 mischief, menacing, reckless endangerment, kidnapping, assault, 22 attempted assault, attempted murder, criminal obstruction of breathing 23 or blood circulation, strangulation, identity theft, grand larceny or 24 coercion, which have been committed by a family or household member of 25 the victim. 26 (e) "Family or household members" mean the following individuals: 27 (i) persons related by consanguinity or affinity; 28 (ii) persons legally married to one another; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14459-03-6 A. 10453 2 1 (iii) persons formerly married to one another regardless of whether 2 they still reside in the same household; 3 (iv) persons who have a child in common regardless of whether such 4 persons are married or have lived together at any time; 5 (v) unrelated persons who are continually or at regular intervals 6 living in the same household or who have in the past continually or at 7 regular intervals lived in the same household; 8 (vi) persons who are not related by consanguinity or affinity and who 9 are or have been in an intimate relationship regardless of whether such 10 persons have lived together at any time. Factors that may be considered 11 in determining whether a relationship is an "intimate relationship" 12 include, but are not limited to: the nature or type of relationship, 13 regardless of whether the relationship is sexual in nature; the frequen- 14 cy of interaction between the persons; and the duration of the relation- 15 ship. Neither a casual acquaintance nor ordinary fraternization between 16 two individuals in business or social contexts shall be deemed to 17 constitute an "intimate relationship"; or 18 (vii) any other category of individuals deemed to be a victim of 19 domestic violence as defined by the office of children and family 20 services in regulation. 21 2. (a) There is created within the division a registry of persistent 22 domestic violence offenders. 23 (b) The division shall maintain this registry based upon information 24 supplied to the division by the court clerks pursuant to paragraphs (c) 25 and (d) of this subdivision and information available to the division 26 from the department of corrections and community supervision and state 27 and local law enforcement agencies. The division shall make the registry 28 available for public inquiry on the internet. 29 (c) The registry shall consist of the persistent domestic violence 30 offender's name, date of birth, conviction date, county or counties of 31 convictions, and a current photograph of the persistent domestic 32 violence offender. If available after reasonable inquiry, the court 33 clerk shall provide the division with a copy of the persistent domestic 34 violence offender's driver license, or other state or federal identifi- 35 cation, and such other identifying data as the division determines is 36 necessary to properly identify the persistent domestic violence offender 37 and exclude innocent persons. However, the registry available for public 38 inquiry must not include the persistent domestic violence offender's 39 address, social security number, driver license number, or any other 40 state or federal identification number. 41 (d)(i) If a person is convicted of an offense committed against a 42 victim of domestic violence and the person convicted has at least one 43 prior conviction for an offense committed against a victim of domestic 44 violence, then the court shall, upon proof of any prior convictions 45 committed against a victim of domestic violence, order the defendant to 46 register as a persistent domestic violence offender under this section. 47 (ii) If a court orders a defendant to register under this section, 48 then the court clerk shall forward to the division a certified copy of 49 the qualifying conviction and the date of birth of the defendant. The 50 court clerk shall forward the information to the division within seven 51 days of the date of the conviction. 52 (e) In addition to any other punishment that may be imposed for a 53 conviction of the offense, a defendant required to register under this 54 section shall be assessed a registration fee in the amount of one 55 hundred fifty dollars, which shall be paid to the clerk of the court 56 imposing the sentence, who shall: A. 10453 3 1 (i) Retain fifty dollars of the fee for the administration of this 2 section, which shall be reserved for the purposes authorized by this 3 section at the end of each fiscal year; and 4 (ii) Remit one hundred dollars of the fee to the domestic violence 5 awareness fund established pursuant to section ninety-seven-yyy of the 6 state finance law, as added by chapter six hundred thirty-four of the 7 laws of two thousand two. 8 (f) The division shall remove from the registry the name and other 9 identifying information of a persistent domestic violence offender 10 required to register under this section: 11 (i) Five years after the date of the most recent conviction for an 12 offense committed against a domestic abuse victim if the defendant has 13 one prior conviction for an offense committed against a victim of domes- 14 tic violence; 15 (ii) Seven years after the date of the most recent conviction for an 16 offense committed against a domestic abuse victim if the defendant has 17 two prior convictions for an offense committed against a victim of 18 domestic violence; 19 (iii) Ten years after the date of the most recent conviction for an 20 offense committed against a domestic abuse victim if the defendant has 21 three prior convictions for an offense committed against a victim of 22 domestic violence; and 23 (iv) Twenty years after the date of the most recent conviction for an 24 offense committed against a domestic abuse victim if the defendant has 25 four or more prior convictions for an offense committed against a victim 26 of domestic violence. 27 (g) Prior to including a persistent domestic violence offender on the 28 registry established pursuant to this section, the division shall 29 provide the domestic abuse victim the option of declining to have such 30 persistent domestic violence offender included on the registry. 31 3. This section applies only to persons convicted of a domestic 32 violence offense that occurred on or after January first, two thousand 33 twenty-seven; provided, however, that a prior conviction for the 34 purposes of this section may have occurred before such date. 35 § 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.